Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201285-1501.01
Financing;
legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes
the need for and importance of a strong partnership with the community colleges
to assure the continued economic growth of the state. In recognition of that
partnership, the Legislature affirms that community colleges should be financed
through a funding partnership from property tax, state aid, tuition and fees, and other sources
of revenue.

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 67;

Laws 2012, LB946, § 15.
February 14, 2012